California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
 and security shall be subject to the prior review and approval of the Exposition Park Manager. Any agreements or leases between the California Science Center and the California Science Center Foundation relating to the Phase III Project shall obligate the California Science Center Foundation to reimburse the state for any lost revenue of the state while the Phase III Project is under construction to the extent resulting from the lost use of any area of Exposition Park other than the area approved to be occupied by the Phase III Facilities pursuant to the schematic design approved by the board of directors of the California Science Center on July 23, 2014, as may be revised from time to time by agreement between the parties thereto and with the approval of the Natural Resources Agency and the Department of Finance. Before the commencement of any construction of the Phase III Facilities, including, but not limited to, any related demolition of existing structures, the California Science Center Foundation and
 the Exposition Park Manager shall meet and confer in order to develop a construction schedule that shall not interfere with any previously scheduled events on the Exposition Park property. After the development of that construction schedule, the Exposition Park Manager shall coordinate any future event scheduling that could affect the construction of the Phase III Facilities with the California Science Center Foundation and its construction schedule. Any agreements or leases between the California Science Center and the California Science Center Foundation relating to the Phase III Project shall obligate the California Science Center Foundation to coordinate its construction schedule with the Exposition Park Manager with respect to special events planned on Exposition Park property. Any agreements or leases between the California Science Center and the California Science Center Foundation relating to the Phase III Project shall also obligate the California Science Center Foundation to indemnify, defend, and
 save harmless the state from any and all claims and losses resulting from any failure of the California Science Center Foundation to adhere to its construction schedule, as that schedule may be revised from time to time in consultation with the Exposition Park Manager, or to coordinate its construction schedule with the Exposition Park Manager with respect to special events planned on Exposition Park property, except, in each case, to the extent resulting from the failure of the Exposition Park Manager to coordinate any events planned in Exposition Park that could affect the construction with the California Science Center Foundation and its construction schedule.

(3) The California Science Center Foundation shall ensure the Phase III Facilities are inspected during construction by the state in a manner consistent with state infrastructure projects. Before commencement of construction, the California Science Center Foundation and the California
 Science Center, upon consultation with the Department of General Services, the Natural Resources Agency, and the Department of Finance, shall agree on a reasonable level of state oversight throughout the construction of the Phase III Facilities to ensure the approved project scope is maintained, that initial estimates regarding long-term operation and maintenance obligations remain accurate, and that all project requirements are met.

(4) Any agreements or leases between the California Science Center and the California Science Center Foundation relating to the Phase III Project shall provide that, upon completion and certification that the Phase III Facilities are available for use and occupancy, the ownership and operation of the Phase III Facilities shall be under the control of the California Science Center with respect to the building and any museum-related structures and Exposition Park with respect to the other structures and the adjacent
 plazas and landscaping, provided that, during the term of the site lease and the lease-purchase agreement, title to the Phase III Facilities operated by the California Science Center shall be held by the California Science Center Foundation, and at the end of the term of the site lease and the lease-purchase agreement, unencumbered title to the Phase III Facilities shall transfer to the state with jurisdiction held by the California Science Center in accordance with the lease-purchase agreement.

(5) Notwithstanding any other law, including, but not limited to, Section 11007 of the Government Code, the California Science Center may consult with the Department of General Services for the procurement of property insurance, including fire, lightning, and extended coverage insurance, on the Phase III Facilities, subject to reasonable deductibles, provided the insurance is available on the open market from reputable insurance companies at a
 reasonable cost.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Phase III Facilities” shall mean all buildings, structures, and plazas and landscaping adjacent to those buildings and structures constructed by the California Science Center Foundation as part of the Phase III Project of the California Science Center. “Phase III Facilities” shall not include exhibit elements and artifacts and the temporary space shuttle display pavilion.

(2) “Phase III Project” shall mean the development, design, construction, equipping, furnishing, operation, and funding of the Phase III Facilities, as well as all exhibit elements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 37, Sec. 9.   (AB 1817)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4104.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that there is a need for a state repository dedicated to the diverse contributions of African Americans to the history and culture of this state and the nation.

(b) The California African American Museum is a part of Exposition Park and coexists with the California Science Center.

(c) The California African American Museum is governed by a seven-member board of directors. The Governor shall appoint the seven members, at least four of whom shall reside within the boundaries of the 6th Agricultural District. In addition, the Senator representing the Senate district in which the California African American Museum is located and the Assembly Member representing
 the Assembly district in which the museum is located shall be ex officio nonvoting members of the board. The two legislative ex officio nonvoting members of the board shall participate in the activities of the board to the extent that their participation is not incompatible with their respective positions as Members of the Legislature. The appointees of the Governor shall be appointed to four-year terms with the initial terms of appointment expiring as follows: one term expiring January 1, 1984, one term expiring January 1, 1985, one term expiring January 1, 1986, and one term expiring January 1, 1987. The person appointed to the Advisory Board of the California Museum of African American History and Culture by the Board of Directors of the California Science Center before the amendments made to this section by Chapter 1439 of the Statutes of 1987 shall serve on the Board of Directors of the California African American Museum until the Governor makes the fifth appointment authorized pursuant to those
 amendments. The fifth appointment made to the board shall serve a term expiring on January 1, 1990, the sixth appointment shall serve a term expiring on January 1, 1991, and the seventh appointment shall serve a term expiring on January 1, 1992.

(d) The Board of Directors of the California African American Museum shall have the authority, subject to existing state laws, regulations, and procedures, to determine how funds that have been appropriated and duly allocated by the Legislature and the Governor for support of the museum shall be expended. The board also shall have the authority, subject to existing state laws, regulations, and procedures, to contract with any state agency, institution, independent contractor, or private nonprofit organization that the board determines to be appropriate and qualified to assist in the operation of the museum. The board shall further have authority to establish the operations, programs, activities, and
 exhibitions of the California African American Museum. The Board of Directors of the California African American Museum shall be solely responsible for the actions taken and the expenditures made by the staff of the California African American Museum in the scope and course of their employment.

(e) The Board of Directors of the California African American Museum shall appoint an executive director, who shall be exempt from civil service, and any necessary staff to carry out the provisions of this section, who shall be subject to the State Civil Service Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section 18500) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The California African American Museum shall submit its annual budget request directly to the Natural Resources Agency. The California African American Museum may accept grants, contributions, and appropriations from federal, state, local, and private sources for its operation.

(f) The California African American Museum shall preserve, collect, and display samples of African American contributions to the arts, sciences, religion, education, literature, entertainment, politics, sports, and history of the state and the nation. The enrichment and historical perspective of that collection shall be made available for public use and enjoyment.

(g) The California African American Museum shall use stationery and other supplies of the former museum and shall phase in the name change with existing resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 7.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4104.5.

(a) The board may enter into concession contracts to license or sell, or both, its branded merchandise, images, and other museum-related merchandise directly to the public for revenue generation. Concession contracts, other than those entered into pursuant to Section 4105.5, shall be issued through competitive requests for proposals, and shall seek the best value for the state through a mixture of rental rates or revenue shares, or both. A concession contract executed pursuant to this section shall not exceed five years in length, with one automatic right to renew at new terms, which shall be mutually agreeable to the board and the concessionaire, including any necessary adjustments in rental rates or revenue shares. The board shall require a provision that allows termination at any time with 180 days prior
 notice.

(b) The board may license or sell, or both, its branded merchandise, images, and other museum-related merchandise directly to the public at the board’s discretion.

(c) In addition to onsite concessions, the board may enter into merchandise agreements with individuals, public agencies, qualified nonprofit organizations, and other private entities for sale of museum-branded merchandise, images, or other museum-related merchandise to the public. The California African American Museum shall receive fair and reasonable revenues and commissions from any merchandise agreement. These merchandise agreements shall be approved by the Natural Resources Agency and the Department of General Services and shall be subject to all state audit requirements.

(d) All rents, revenues, and commissions received by the California
 African American Museum as a result of this section shall be paid into a designated account within the Exposition Park Improvement Fund, established pursuant to Section 4106.

(e) For purposes of this section, “board” means the Board of Directors of the California African American Museum.

(f) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2030, and, as of January 1, 2031, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 8.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Inoperative July 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4105.

Notwithstanding any other law, from December 14 to December 21, inclusive, of any year, a state entity shall not charge parking fees for the parking facilities surrounding the Los Angeles Memorial Coliseum when an event is being held at the facilities of the museum by a private nonprofit charitable organization for the purpose of collection and distribution of toys and food.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 37, Sec. 11.   (AB 1817)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4105.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms apply:

(1) “Board” means the Board of Directors of the California African American Museum.

(2) “Foundation” means the California African American Museum Foundation.

(3) “Museum” means the California African American Museum.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that the operation of the museum may require individual skills not generally available in state civil service to support specialized functions, such as special exhibit development and maintenance, indemnity protection, and educational and
 guest services programs.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the executive director of the museum may, with the approval of the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, work to establish a nongovernmental trust, to be known as the California African American Museum Foundation.

(d) The purposes of the foundation shall be all of the following:

(1) To seek funds for the museum to expand its public programming.

(2) To jointly manage a gift store or museum store onsite, the proceeds of which will be used to fund further programming at the museum as determined by the board.

(3) To jointly manage public events that promote the mission of the museum.

(4) To encourage the development of youth-based programming, particularly internship and arts-based programming that help develop employment skills in the local and regional community, with an emphasis on disadvantaged communities in or around the museum.

(e) The foundation shall be subject to the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code). To the extent of any conflict between this section and the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law, this section shall prevail.

(f) For purposes of developing the foundation, the executive director of the museum may use state funds, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to contract with any private or nonprofit law firm to help establish the foundation and provide it with general counsel for not
 more than one year from the date of its inception. The museum shall in no way be legally responsible for any action or decision made by the foundation.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, the museum may develop and enter into no-bid personal services contracts, joint management agreements, lease agreements, and other contracts with the foundation subject to approval by the Natural Resources Agency and the Department of General Services and subject to all state audit requirements.

(h) Notwithstanding any other law, and in accordance with written procedures established by the board, the museum may enter into agreements to secure donations, memberships, and corporate and individual sponsorships, and may enter into marketing and licensing agreements for the receipt of money, or services or products in lieu of money, and may enter into an agreement with the foundation or others to
 develop, solicit, sell, and service these agreements. Any fees charged, or revenues shared with the foundation or other contractors, pursuant to these agreements shall be subject to approval by the Natural Resources Agency and the Department of General Services and subject to all state audit requirements. The museum shall limit the foundation to reasonable administration fees, which fees shall cover both direct, indirect, and overhead expenses of the foundation. All revenue generated and received by the foundation pursuant to this section shall be used for the benefit of the museum, except for those reasonable administration costs incurred by the foundation in managing those funds.

(i) Notwithstanding any other law, and in accordance with written procedures established by the board, the museum may authorize the foundation to represent it for the purpose of receiving donations on its behalf both onsite, and through the use of copyrighted
 marketing material. If the museum provides authorization for the foundation to represent it, as described in this section, the board may require the foundation to report quarterly on revenues received and expended. All revenues generated and received by the foundation shall be used for the benefit of the museum, except those reasonable administration costs incurred by the foundation in managing those funds, which administration costs shall be determined by mutual donation agreement before the acceptance of any donations or use of any marks owned by the museum. The mutual donation agreement shall be subject to approval by the Natural Resources Agency and the Department of General Services and be subject to all state audit requirements.

(j) Consistent with any mutual donation agreement authorized in subdivision (i), the board may further authorize the foundation to use the museum for special events. The foundation shall either charge a fee for
 the special events or accept minimum donations in lieu of fees, which moneys shall be subject to the mutual donation agreement. All fees and donations received by the foundation for special events shall be itemized and accounted for to the board at its next regularly scheduled meeting. For all foundation managed events, the foundation shall obtain necessary insurance, and comply with all appropriate public safety and janitorial services, and shall provide its own staff or contractors to develop and manage the special event. All special events shall be preapproved by the executive director of the board, in consultation with the Natural Resources Agency.

(k) The executive director of the board, on behalf of the board, shall annually report on the status of all foundation activities to the Department of Finance regarding the various agreements and revenues identified in this section. The Department of Finance may, upon reasonable notice, examine
 the books and records of the foundation, and all parties in contract with the museum.

(l) On or before January 10, 2024, and annually thereafter, the Department of Finance, in coordination with the foundation, shall submit a report to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and appropriate subcommittees that consider the State Budget, the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office. The report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) An update on foundation activities undertaken pursuant to the authorities granted in this section.

(2) Details on all joint management agreements, lease agreements, and any contracts executed between the State of California
 and the foundation.

(3) Revenues and expenditures associated with foundation activities at the museum.

(4) A summary of agreements entered into pursuant to subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 4104.5 that is expected to involve a total investment or estimated annual gross sales in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(m) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2030, and, as of January 1, 2031, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 9.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Inoperative July 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4106.

(a) Exposition Park shall work with the Los Angeles Memorial Coliseum Commission, the City of Los Angeles, and the County of Los Angeles to develop additional parking facilities in Exposition Park to the extent necessary to allow for expansion of the park.

(b) Exposition Park shall manage or operate its parking facilities in a manner that preserves and protects the interests of the California Science Center and the California African American Museum and recognizes the cultural and educational character of Exposition Park.

(c) The Exposition Park Improvement Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. All revenues received by Exposition Park from its parking facilities, from rental of state
 facilities, or from other business activities shall be deposited in the Exposition Park Improvement Fund.

(d) The moneys in the Exposition Park Improvement Fund may only be used, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for improvements to Exposition Park, including, but not limited to, maintenance of existing state facilities, replacement of state equipment, supplies and wages expended to generate revenues from rental of state facilities, development of new parking facilities, and acquisition of land within or adjacent to Exposition Park.

(e) (1) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that there is a need for development of additional park, recreation, museum, and parking facilities in Exposition Park. The Legislature recognizes that the provision of these needed improvements as identified in the Exposition Park Master Plan may require the use of funds
 provided by other governmental agencies or private donors.

(2) Exposition Park may accept funds from other governmental agencies or private contributions for the purpose of implementation of the Exposition Park Master Plan. The private contributions and funds from governmental agencies other than state governmental agencies shall be deposited in the Exposition Park Improvement Fund in the State Treasury and shall be available for expenditure without regard to fiscal years by Exposition Park for implementation of the Exposition Park Master Plan. Funds from other state governmental agencies shall be deposited in the Exposition Park Improvement Fund and shall be available for expenditure, upon appropriation, by Exposition Park for implementation of the Exposition Park Master Plan. However, any expenditure is not authorized sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor to the chairperson of the committee in each house
 of the Legislature that considers appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time as the chairperson of the joint committee, or his or her designee, may in each instance determine. Neither the City of Los Angeles nor the County of Los Angeles shall impose any tax upon tickets purchased authorizing the use of parking facilities owned by Exposition Park.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 37, Sec. 12.   (AB 1817)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4107.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a Member of the Legislature representing any district in Los Angeles County may be appointed as a director of the California Science Center.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 841, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4108.

There shall be established in Exposition Park the position of Exposition Park Manager to be filled by a person appointed by the Governor for the purpose of managing, scheduling, and administering all park-related events, including, but not limited to, oversight for the police and security services of the park.

(a) The Exposition Park Manager may appoint the chief, assistant chief, and all security and safety officers of museum security and safety who shall have the powers of peace officers as specified in Section 830.3 of the Penal Code.

(b) The officers appointed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall have completed the regular basic training course
 prescribed by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training. The officers shall provide police and security services to keep order and to preserve the peace and safety of persons and property at all facilities in Exposition Park on a year-round basis, in coordination with the direction or information provided by the Exposition Park Manager.

(c) The Exposition Park Manager, in consultation with the Natural Resources Agency and the Department of General Services, shall approve the leasing, construction, or alteration of existing facilities within Exposition Park. The
 executive director of the California Science Center and the executive director of the California African American Museum, in consultation with the Natural Resources Agency and the Department of General Services, shall approve the leasing, construction, or alteration of their respective museum facilities. All actions taken pursuant to this subdivision shall only occur upon approval or delegation of authority by the respective board of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 411, Sec. 1.   (AB 483)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4108.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Agency” means the Natural Resources Agency.

(2) “Department” means the Department of General Services.

(3) “Exposition Park” means the Sixth District Agricultural Association, and shall also be known as the Office of Exposition Park Management.

(4) “Nonprofit organization” means a recognized nonprofit organization that is tax exempt pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and that represents victims and survivors of the Holocaust.

(b) Consistent with funding and authority provided in the annual budget act, the agency may enter into a noncompetitive grant with a nonprofit organization, subject to the requirements of this section.

(c) The nonprofit organization, in consultation with the agency and department, may plan, construct, and maintain a memorial to the victims and survivors of the Holocaust at Exposition Park in accordance with this section. The memorial shall be consistent with the operating policies and procedures of the Office of Exposition Park Management, including the location of the memorial.

(d) The department, in consultation with the nonprofit organization and the agency, shall do all of the following:

(1) Review the preliminary design plans to identify potential
 maintenance concerns.

(2) Review and approve any documents prepared pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).

(3) Review final construction documents to ensure that the documents comply with all applicable laws.

(4) Inspect all construction performed by the contractor selected by the nonprofit organization pursuant to this section.

(e) The nonprofit organization, in consultation with the Office of Exposition Park Management and with the approval of the agency and department, shall do both of the following:

(1) Prepare the right-of-entry permit outlining the final area of work, final construction
 documents, construction plans, the contractor hired to perform the work, insurance, bonding, provisions for damage to state property, and inspection requirements.

(2) Prepare an agreement for the long-term maintenance and security of the memorial.

(f) This section shall be implemented only upon appropriation by the Legislature for its purposes in the Budget Act or other statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 14, Sec. 1.   (SB 124)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4109.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms apply:

(1) “Foundation” means the Exposition Park Foundation.

(2) “Office” means the office of the Exposition Park Manager, as described in Section 4108.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the office may, with the approval of the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, work to establish a nongovernmental trust, known as the Exposition Park Foundation.

(c) The purpose of the foundation shall be all of the following:

(1) To seek funds for
 Exposition Park to expand its public programming and infrastructure developments and improvements.

(2) To jointly manage public events that promote the mission of Exposition Park.

(3) To lease portions of state property consistent with the state processes and approvals, and to develop, construct, equip, furnish, and fund the Exposition Park Master Plan or other initiatives of Exposition Park on those properties consistent with lease terms.

(d) For purposes of subdivision (c), in connection with the development described in subdivision (c) of Section 4108, the foundation may, in its determination, select the most qualified construction manager or general contractor to oversee and manage the work and prepare the competitive bid packages for all major subcontractors to be engaged in the implementation and development of
 the Exposition Park Master Plan. Any construction manager or general contractor selected shall be required to have a California general contractor’s license.

(e) The foundation shall be subject to the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code). To the extent of any conflict between this section and the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law, this section shall prevail.

(f) For purposes of developing the foundation, the office may use state funds, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to contract with any private or nonprofit law firm to help establish the foundation and provide it with general counsel for not more than one year from the date of its inception. The office shall in no way be legally responsible for any action or decision made by the foundation.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, the office may develop and enter into no-bid personal services contracts, joint management agreements, lease agreements, and other contracts or grants, as appropriations and funding permits, with the foundation subject to approval by the Natural Resources Agency and the Department of General Services and subject to all state audit requirements.

(h) Notwithstanding any other law, the office may enter into agreements to secure donations, memberships, and corporate and individual sponsorships, and may enter into marketing and licensing agreements for the receipt of money, or services or products in lieu of money, and may enter into an agreement with the foundation or others to develop, solicit, sell, and service these agreements. Any fees charged, or revenues shared with the foundation or other contractors, pursuant to these agreements shall be subject
 to approval by the Natural Resources Agency and the Department of General Services and subject to all state audit requirements. The office shall limit the foundation to reasonable administration fees, which fees shall cover both direct, indirect, and overhead expenses of the foundation. All revenue generated and received by the foundation pursuant to this section shall be used for the benefit of Exposition Park, except for those reasonable administration costs incurred by the foundation in managing those funds.

(i) Notwithstanding any other law, the office may authorize the foundation to represent it for the purpose of receiving donations on its behalf both onsite, and through the use of copyrighted marketing material. If the office provides authorization for the foundation to represent it, as described in this section, the office may require the foundation to report quarterly on revenues received and expended. All revenues generated and
 received by the foundation shall be used for the benefit of Exposition Park and associated programming efforts, except those reasonable administration costs incurred by the foundation in managing those funds, which administration costs shall be determined by mutual donation agreement before the acceptance of any donations or use of any marks owned by the office. The mutual donation agreement shall be subject to approval by the Natural Resources Agency and the Department of General Services and subject to all state audit requirements.

(j) Consistent with any mutual donation agreement authorized in subdivision (i), the office may further authorize the foundation to use Exposition Park for special events. The foundation shall either charge a fee for the special events or accept minimum donations in lieu of fees, which moneys shall be subject to the mutual donation agreement. All fees and donations received by the foundation for special events
 shall be itemized and accounted for to the office regularly. For all foundation managed special events, the foundation shall obtain necessary insurance, and comply with all appropriate public safety and janitorial services, and shall provide its own staff or contractors to develop and manage the special event. All special events shall be preapproved by the Exposition Park Manager, in consultation with the Natural Resources Agency.

(k) The Exposition Park Manager, on behalf of the office, shall annually report on the status of all foundation activities to the Department of Finance regarding the various agreements and revenues identified in this section. The Department of Finance may, upon reasonable notice, examine the books and records of the foundation, and all parties in contract with the office.

(l) The Legislature finds and declares that the operation of Exposition Park may
 require individual skills not generally available in state civil service to support specialized functions, such as special event development and programming, and educational and guest services programs.

(m) Notwithstanding any other law, Exposition Park may enter into a personal services contract or contracts with the foundation without a competitive bidding process. These contracts shall be subject to approval by the Natural Resources Agency and the Department of General Services and be subject to all state audit requirements.

(n) The office may enter into concession contracts to license or sell, or both, its branded merchandise, images, and other park-related merchandise directly to the public for revenue generation. Concession contracts, other than those contracts entered into pursuant to subdivisions (d), (f), (g), (h), (i), and (j) shall be issued through competitive requests
 for proposals, and shall seek the best value for the state through a mixture of rental rates or revenue shares, or both. A concession contract executed pursuant to this section shall not exceed five years in length, with one automatic right to renew at new terms, which shall be mutually agreeable to the office and the concessionaire, including any necessary adjustments in rental rates or revenue shares. The office shall require a provision that allows termination at any time with 180 days prior notice.

(o) The office may license or sell, or both, its branded merchandise, images, and other park-related merchandise directly to the public in its discretion.

(p) In addition to onsite concessions, the office may enter into merchandise agreements with individuals, public agencies, qualified nonprofit organizations, and other private entities for sale of park-branded merchandise, images,
 or other park-related merchandise to the public. The office shall receive fair and reasonable revenues and commissions from any merchandise agreement. These merchandise agreements shall be approved by the Natural Resources Agency and the Department of General Services and subject to all state audit requirements.

(q) All rents, revenues, and commissions received by Exposition Park pursuant to subdivisions (n), (o), and (p) shall be paid into a designated special fund within the Exposition Park Improvement Fund, established pursuant to Section 4106.

(r) On or before January 10, 2024, and annually thereafter, the Department of Finance, in coordination with the office, shall submit a report to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and appropriate subcommittees that consider the State Budget,
 the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office. The report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) An update on the foundation’s activities undertaken pursuant to the authorities granted in this section.

(2) Details on all joint management agreements, lease agreements, and any contracts executed between the State of California and the foundation.

(3) Revenues and expenditures associated with foundation activities at Exposition Park.

(4) A summary of agreements entered into pursuant to subdivisions (n), (o), and (p) that is expected to involve a total investment or estimated annual gross sales in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(s) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2030, and, as of January 1, 2031, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 10.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Inoperative July 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. 1-A District Agricultural Association [4131. - 4131.]

4131.

The City and County of San Francisco may appropriate and pay over to the 1-A District Agricultural Association for the general uses and purposes of the association such sums of money as the city and county may determine.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. 22nd District Agricultural Association [4155. - 4158.]

4155.

The 22nd District Agricultural Association may expend up to seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) annually for the operation of a fair pursuant to Section 4001 for the purposes enumerated therein from funds received by the district from a lease of district property for horse racing purposes. Any funds thereby received by the district in excess of this seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) may be expended in furtherance of the master plan developed pursuant to Section 4156. Any of these funds that are not expended in this manner, or accumulated to be expended in furtherance of the master plan, including the amortization of revenue bonds, shall be transferred by the district to the General Fund upon executive order of the Director of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 370, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4156.

The State Race Track Leasing Commission shall prepare a master plan for the long-range comprehensive development and improvement of, and construction upon, the property of the 22nd District Agricultural Association. Such plan shall prescribe the amounts which may be expended for the various features of the plan, the period authorized for the completion of each such feature, and the terms of any revenue bond financing undertaken with respect to such plan. Such plan is subject to amendment by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1579.)
-------------------------------------------

4157.
